Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.510

Fairness in lending act—Unlawful practices.

Subject to RCW 30A.04.515, it shall be unlawful for any financial institution, in processing any application for a loan to be secured by a single-family residence to:

(1) Deny or vary the terms of a loan on the basis that a specific parcel of real estate offered as security is located in a specific geographical area, unless building, remodeling, or continued habitation in such specific geographical area is prohibited or restricted by any local, state, or federal law or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.

(2) Utilize lending standards that have no economic basis.

[ 2014 c 37 s 144; 1977 ex.s. c 301 s 12. Formerly RCW 30.04.510.]